Illinois, session 104th, HB5774.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.20 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.20)7    Sec. 5-5.20. Clinic payments. For services provided by 8federally qualified health centers (FQHC) and FQHC Look-Alikes 9(LALs) as defined in Section 1905 (l)(2)(B) of the federal 10Social Security Act, on or after April 1, 1989, and as long as 11required by federal law, the Illinois Department shall 12reimburse those FQHCs and LALs health centers for those 13services according to a prospective cost-reimbursement 14methodology as required by Section 1902(bb) of the federal 15Social Security Act and paragraphs (1) through (6) of this 16Section. In setting this prospective cost-reimbursement 17methodology, the Illinois Department shall seek a State Plan 18amendment from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 19(CMS) as soon as possible. The Illinois Department shall 20implement the State Plan amendment promptly after CMS approval 21and no later than 30 days after approval. The State Plan 22amendment shall contain the following provisions: .23        (1) Prospective Payment System (PPS) rates for FQHCs,   HB5774- 2 -LRB104 21890 KTG 37769 b1    whether initial rates or rates adjusted in accordance with 2    paragraph (2), shall be based on reasonable costs of each 3    individual FQHC related to the provision of covered 4    ambulatory services using the cost principles found at 2 5    Code of Federal Regulations Part 200 or its successor. 6    Such rates shall be set without the application of cost 7    caps, productivity standards, the use of statewide 8    averages or other methods unrelated to the specific, 9    reasonable cost of the individual FQHC; notwithstanding 10    the foregoing, the Illinois Department shall pay FQHCs for 11    vaccines separately on a fee-for-service basis and the 12    cost of such vaccines shall not be included in the PPS 13    rate.14        (2) Rate adjustment process. Each FQHC shall have its 15    rate adjusted annually by the Medicare Economic Index as 16    required by Section 1902(bb)(3)(A) of the federal Social 17    Security Act, and shall also have the right annually to 18    apply for an adjustment, as required by Section 19    1902(bb)(3)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, to its 20    current rate to take into account statutory and regulatory 21    changes, including changes as a result of this amendatory 22    Act of the 104th General Assembly as well as other changes 23    that affect the type, intensity, duration, or amount of 24    services provided in an average visit; for the purposes of 25    this paragraph, the new adjusted rate shall be equivalent 26    to the total cost per visit for the FQHC's fiscal year in   HB5774- 3 -LRB104 21890 KTG 37769 b1    which the changes took place and shall be finalized by the 2    Illinois Department within 90 days of the FQHC's 3    application.4        (3) Rate setting for new FQHCs. The Illinois 5    Department shall establish a process to set a provisional 6    PPS rate for a new FQHC based upon 100% of the projected 7    cost per visit for the provision of ambulatory services as 8    required in this Section; this provisional rate shall be 9    replaced by a final PPS rate based on 100% of the actual 10    costs of the FQHC for the first full fiscal year of 11    operation as an FQHC as approved by the Illinois 12    Department within 12 months of the end of that fiscal 13    year; the Illinois Department shall reconcile the 14    provisional PPS rate to the actual, final PPS rate and 15    make any necessary payment adjustments.16        (4) Payment in the event of Medicaid Managed Care. The 17    Illinois Department shall ensure that:18            (A) FQHCs are fully paid under the methodology 19        required by Section 1902(bb) of the federal Social 20        Security Act when serving a Medicaid beneficiary 21        regardless of whether or not that FQHC has entered 22        into a provider agreement with a Medicaid managed care 23        organization (MCO) in which the beneficiary is 24        enrolled;25            (B) if it utilizes the MCOs to fulfill or 26        eliminate its obligation to make the supplemental or   HB5774- 4 -LRB104 21890 KTG 37769 b1        wraparound payment to one or more FQHCs as required 2        under Section 1902(bb)(5) of the federal Social 3        Security Act, it shall make a payment on at least a 4        quarterly basis to the MCOs to compensate them for 5        fulfilling or eliminating that obligation; such 6        payment shall be in addition to and separate from the 7        monthly capitated payment negotiated between the 8        Illinois Department and the MCOs; and9            (C) FQHCs are fully compensated in a managed care 10        setting if they have more than one type of visit per 11        day per patient.12        (5) Payment in the event of dual enrollment in 13    Medicare and Medicaid. The Illinois Department shall 14    ensure that: 15            (A) FQHCs are fully compensated under the 16        methodology required by Section 1902(bb) of the 17        federal Social Security Act when serving an individual 18        who is both a Medicaid beneficiary and a federal 19        Medicare beneficiary; and20            (B) payment to an FQHC equals the amount due to the 21        FQHC under Section 1902(bb) of the federal Social 22        Security Act less any amount paid to the FQHC for the 23        same beneficiary visit by Medicare. 24        (6) Appeal rights. The Illinois Department shall 25    ensure that FQHCs receive notice and an opportunity to 26    appeal any Department determination set forth in   HB5774- 5 -LRB104 21890 KTG 37769 b1    paragraphs (1) through (5) in accordance with State 2    administrative procedures.3    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 4rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 5any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 6of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 7with Section 5-5e.8(Source: P.A. 97-689, eff. 6-14-12.)